Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Mineral Deeds

381.930.
Purposes of KRS 381.935 to 381.945.

The purposes of KRS

381.935

to

381.945

are as follows:

To facilitate and require the demonstration of a clear understanding between the owners of surface and mineral estates in land concerning their respective rights to use and occupy or injure the surface of the land;

To protect the security of titles to land and improvements thereto;

To promote the free alienability of land;

To prevent hardship and injustice to surface or mineral owners arising from uncertainty of the law;

To promote the conservation and the full and efficient use of all natural resources of the state, including the land, the making of improvements to the land, the growth of agriculture, the development of new industry and the general economic well-being of the state and its people;

To codify a rule of construction for mineral deeds relating to coal extraction so as to implement the intention of the parties at the time the instrument was created; and

To foster certainty and uniformity in the operation of the law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

381.935.
Definitions.

For the purpose of KRS

381.940

, “method” and “methods” mean underground, surface, auger, or open pit mining and nothing in KRS

381.940

shall be interpreted to adversely affect the use of modern equipment or machinery with respect to mining methods permitted under KRS 381.940.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 28, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Akers v. Baldwin: The Broad Form Deed Dilemma Revisited, 4 J. M. L. & P. 213 (1988).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Greenwell, On the Constitutionality of Kentucky’s Mineral Deed Act, 13 N. Ky. L. Rev. 219 (1986).

381.940.
Rules of construction for mineral deeds relating to coal extraction.

In any instrument heretofore or hereafter executed purporting to sever the surface and mineral estates or to grant a mineral estate or to grant a right to extract minerals, which fails to state or describe in express and specific terms the method of coal extraction to be employed, or where said instrument contains language subordinating the surface estate to the mineral estate, it shall be held, in the absence of clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, that the intention of the parties to the instrument was that the coal be extracted only by the method or methods of commercial coal extraction commonly known to be in use in Kentucky in the area affected at the time the instrument was executed, and that the mineral estate be dominant to the surface estate only for the purposes of coal extraction by the method or methods of commercial coal extraction commonly known to be in use in Kentucky in the area affected at the time the instrument was executed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 28, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

381.945.
Written agreement in deed directing how surface to be reclaimed.

In any deed in which the minerals are severed from the surface, the present owners of the surface rights may enter into a written agreement directing how the surface shall be reclaimed, and how the property shall be left after the extraction of the minerals, and in compliance with federal and state rules and regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 28, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.